Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-1104
Ordinance or resolution; submit to planning department; report.

No ordinance or resolution which deals with the acquisition, extension, widening, narrowing, removal, vacation, abandonment, sale or other change relating to any public way, transportation route, ground, open space, building or structure, or other public improvement of a character included in the comprehensive plan, the subject matter of which has not been reported on by the planning department under the provisions of section 15-1103, shall be adopted by the council until such ordinance or resolution shall first have been referred to the planning department and that department has reported regarding conformity of the proposed action with the comprehensive plan. The department's report shall specify the character and degree of conformity or nonconformity of each proposed action to the comprehensive plan, and a report in writing thereon shall be rendered to the council within thirty days after the date of receipt of the referral unless a longer period is granted by the council. If the department fails to render any such report within the allotted time, the approval of the department may be presumed by the council.

Laws 1959, c. 46, § 4, p. 230.